Illinois, session 104th, SB2474.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Youth 5Health Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds and declares the following:8    (1) At birth, doctors identify the sex of babies. They do 9not assign them a "gender."10    (2) Being biologically male or biologically female is not 11a disorder, illness, deficiency, shortcoming, or error. 12Scientists and other medical professionals have recognized 13that biological sex is a neutral, objective, and immutable 14fact of human nature.15    (3) Puberty is not a disease or a disorder.16    (4) There is no conclusive, research-based evidence 17proving that if there is incongruence between one's objective 18and immutable biological sex (and its attendant healthy and 19normally functioning anatomy and physiology) and one's 20subjective, internal sense of being male or female that the 21problem resides in the body rather than the mind.22    (5) The May 19, 2014 issue of the highly respected Hayes 23Directory reports that the practice of using hormones and   SB2474- 2 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1surgery to treat gender dysphoria in adults is based on "very 2low quality of evidence" and goes on to discuss the "serious 3limitations to the evidence" in great detail. It reports 4further that the use of hormones and surgery to treat gender 5dysphoria in children and adolescents has no evidence base. 6    (6) Health risks and complications of puberty suppression: 7The use of puberty-suppression medications for the treatment 8of gender-dysphoric minors is "off-label." The health risks 9include the arrest of bone growth, a decrease in bone 10accretion, the prevention of sex-steroid-dependent 11organization and maturation of the adolescent brain, and the 12inhibition of fertility by preventing the development of 13gonadal tissue and mature gametes for the duration of 14treatment. 15    (7) Self-fulfilling nature of puberty suppression: "There 16is an obvious self-fulfilling nature to encouraging a young 17boy with [gender dysphoria] to socially impersonate a girl and 18then institute pubertal suppression. Given the 19well-established phenomenon of neuroplasticity, the repeated 20behavior of impersonating a girl alters the structure and 21function of the boy's brain in some way-potentially in a way 22that will make identity alignment with his biologic sex less 23likely. This, together with the suppression of puberty that 24prevents further endogenous masculinization of his brain, 25causes him to remain a gender non-conforming prepubertal boy 26disguised as a prepubertal girl."   SB2474- 3 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    (8) Cross-sex hormones risks and effects: The use of 2cross-sex hormones for the treatment of gender dysphoria in 3minors is "off-label," and long-term risks are unknown. 4    Sterility and voice changes are permanent for both men and 5women. 6    An interagency statement published by the World Health 7Organization states that "sterilization should only be 8provided with the full, free and informed consent of the 9individual" and that "sterilization refers not just to 10interventions where the intention is to limit fertility ... 11but also to situations where loss of fertility is a secondary 12outcome. ... Sterilization without full, free and informed 13consent has been variously described by international, 14regional and national human rights bodies as an involuntary, 15coercive and/or forced practice, and as a violation of 16fundamental human rights, including the right to health, the 17right to information, the right to privacy." 18    Since parents or guardians must provide consent for 19hormonal interventions, and since parents and guardians are 20not being made aware of the experimental nature of the 21off-label use of hormones for the treatment of gender 22dysphoria or of the fact that most children with gender 23dysphoria outgrow it by late adolescence if otherwise 24supported through natural puberty, parents and guardians are 25unable to provide fully informed consent.26    Breast tissue growth in men who take estrogen is   SB2474- 4 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1permanent. "Male"-pattern baldness and body and facial hair 2growth in women who take testosterone are permanent. 3    For biologically healthy men who take estrogen to treat 4their subjective, internal feelings about their sex, there is 5an "increased risk of liver disease, increased risk of blood 6clots, (risk of death or permanent damage), increased risk of 7diabetes and of headaches/migraines heart disease, increased 8risk of gallstones, may be increased risk of noncancerous 9[tumor] of pituitary gland." 10    For biologically healthy women who take testosterone to 11treat their subjective, internal feelings about their sex, 12there is an increased risk of heart disease, stroke, diabetes, 13breast cancer, ovarian cancer, and uterine cancer. Taking 14testosterone can have a "destabilizing effect" on "bipolar 15disorder, schizoaffective disorder, and schizophrenia." 16    (9) The Christian Medical and Dental Associations 17"[believe] that prescribing hormonal treatments to children or 18adolescents to disrupt normal sexual development for the 19purpose of gender reassignment is ethically impermissible, 20whether requested by the child or the parent." 21    (10) The Catholic Medical Association "urges health care 22professionals to adhere to genetic science and sexual 23complementarity over ideology in the treatment of gender 24dysphoria (GD) in children. This includes especially avoiding 25puberty suppression and the use of cross-sex hormones in 26children with GD. One's sex is not a social construct, but an   SB2474- 5 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1unchangeable biological reality." 2    (11) Surgery (e.g., mastectomy and orchiectomy) is 3irreversible. 4    (12) Teen brain: Neuroscientist, Professor of Neurology at 5the University of Pennsylvania, and author of The Teenage 6Brain, Dr. Frances Jensen, explains that:7    Teenagers do have frontal lobes, which are the seat of our 8executive, adult-like functioning like impulse control, 9judgment and empathy. But the frontal lobes haven't been 10connected with fast-acting connections yet. ...11    But there is another part of the brain that is fully active 12in adolescents, and that's the limbic system. And that is the 13seat of risk, reward, impulsivity, sexual behavior and 14emotion.15    So they are built to be novelty-seeking at this point in 16their lives.17    (13) Suicide rate: The oft-cited suicide rate of 41% for 18those who identify as "trans" is based on an erroneous 19understanding of a study by the Williams Institute, an 20understanding that ignores the acknowledged and serious 21limitations of the study. 22    (14) There is no evidence that surgery or chemical 23disruption of normal, natural, and healthy development or 24processes reduces the incidence of suicide. 25    (15) Dr. J. Michael Bailey, Professor of Psychology at 26Northwestern University, and Dr. Raymond Blanchard, former   SB2474- 6 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1psychologist in the Adult Gender Identity Clinic of Toronto's 2Centre for Addiction and Mental Health (CAMH) from 1980-1995 3and the Head of CAMH's Clinical Sexology Services from 41995-2010, have written the following:5        (a) Children (most commonly, adolescents) who threaten 6    to commit suicide rarely do so, although they are more 7    likely to kill themselves than children who do not 8    threaten suicide.9        (b) Mental health problems, including suicide, are 10    associated with some forms of gender dysphoria. But 11    suicide is rare even among gender dysphoric persons.12        (c) There is no persuasive evidence that gender 13    transition reduces gender dysphoric children's likelihood 14    of suicide. 15        (d) The idea that mental health problems, including 16    suicidality, are caused by gender dysphoria rather than 17    the other way around (i.e., mental health and personality 18    issues cause a vulnerability to experience gender 19    dysphoria) is currently popular and politically correct. 20    It is, however, unproven and as likely to be false as true.21    (16) There is no phenomenon of women trapped in men's 22bodies or vice versa, or of men having women's brains or vice 23versa: Science has not proven that the brains of transgender 24individuals are "wired differently" than others with the same 25biological sex. In other words, there is no conclusive 26evidence of a "female brain" being contained in a male body or   SB2474- 7 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1vice versa. In fact, it is impossible for an opposite sexed 2brain to be "trapped" in the wrong body. Every brain cell of a 3male fetus has a Y chromosome; female fetal brains do not. This 4makes their brains forever intrinsically different. 5Additionally, at 8 weeks gestation, male fetuses have every 6cell of their body, including every brain cell, bathed by a 7testosterone surge secreted by their testes. Female fetuses 8lack testes; none of their cells, including their brain cells, 9experience this endogenous testosterone surge. [Reyes FI, 10Winter JS, Faiman C. "Studies on human sexual development 11Fetal gonadal and adrenal sex steroids"; J Clin Endocrinol 12Metab. 1973 Jul; 37(1):74-8; Lombardo, M. "Fetal Testosterone 13Influences Sexually Dimorphic Gray Matter in the Human Brain"; 14The Journal of Neuroscience, 11 January 2012, 32(2); Campano, 15A. [ed]. Geneva Foundation for Medical Education and Research: 16human sexual differentiation (2016).] 17    (17) Brain-sex theories: "[C]urrent studies on 18associations between brain structure and transgender identity 19are small, methodologically limited, inconclusive, and 20sometimes contradictory. Even if they were more 21methodologically reliable, they would be insufficient to 22demonstrate that brain structure is a cause, rather than an 23effect, of the gender-identity behavior. They would likewise 24lack predictive power, the real challenge for any theory in 25science." 26    (18) Desistance: The best research to date suggests that   SB2474- 8 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1without social or medical "transition" most (60-90%) 2gender-dysphoric children will come to accept their biological 3sex after passing naturally through puberty. While "12-27% of 4'gender variant' children persist in gender dysphoria; that 5percentage rises to 40% amongst those who visit gender 6clinics." Research shows that desistance rates rise 7significantly among those who are given puberty-blockers and 8"gender-affirmative psychotherapy," thus suggesting that such 9interventions lead minors "to commit more strongly to sex 10reassignment than they might have if they had received a 11different diagnosis or a different course of treatment." 12    (19) The American College of Pediatricians confirms what 13"detransitioners" assert: There are many possible post-natal, 14environmental causes for gender dysphoria:15    Family and peer relationships, one's school and 16neighborhood, the experience of any form of abuse, media 17exposure, chronic illness, war, and natural disasters are all 18examples of environmental factors that impact an individual's 19emotional, social, and psychological development. 20    (20) Autism: "Mounting evidence over the last decade 21points to increased rates of autism spectrum disorders (ASD) 22and autism traits among children and adults with gender 23dysphoria, or incongruence between a person's experienced or 24expressed gender and the gender assigned to them at birth. ... 25It is possible that some of the psychological characteristics 26common in children with ASD-including cognitive deficits,   SB2474- 9 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1tendencies toward obsessive preoccupations, or difficulties 2learning from other people-complicate the formation of gender 3identity." 4    (21) A study published in May 2018 "further confirmed a 5possible association between ASD and the wish to be of the 6opposite gender by establishing increased endorsement of this 7wish in adolescents and adults with ASD compared to the 8general population controls." 9    (22) "Rapid-onset gender dysphoria" (ROGD): Dr. J. Michael 10Bailey, Professor of Psychology at Northwestern University, 11and Dr. Raymond Blanchard, former psychologist in the Adult 12Gender Identity Clinic of Toronto's Centre for Addiction and 13Mental Health (CAMH) from 1980-1995 and the Head of CAMH's 14Clinical Sexology Services from 1995-2010, explain the 15phenomenon of ROGD: 16    The typical case of ROGD involves an adolescent or young 17adult female whose social world outside the family glorifies 18transgender phenomena and exaggerates their prevalence. 19Furthermore, it likely includes a heavy dose of internet 20involvement. The adolescent female acquires the conviction 21that she is transgender. (Not uncommonly, others in her peer 22group acquire the same conviction.) These peer groups 23encouraged each other to believe that all unhappiness, 24anxiety, and life problems are likely due to their being 25transgender, and that gender transition is the only solution. 26Subsequently, there may be a rush towards gender transition.   SB2474- 10 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1... We believe that ROGD is a socially contagious phenomenon 2in which a young person-typically a natal female-comes to 3believe that she has a condition that she does not have. ROGD 4is not about discovering gender dysphoria that was there all 5along; rather, it is about falsely coming to believe that 6one's problems have been due to gender dysphoria previously 7hidden (from the self and others). Let us be clear: People with 8ROGD do have a kind of gender dysphoria, but it is gender 9dysphoria due to persuasion of those especially vulnerable to 10a false idea. 11    (23) Brown University Researcher, Dr. Lisa Littman, 12conducted a survey of parents whose children developed Rapid 13Onset Gender Dysphoria. Littman wrote that the "worsening of 14mental well-being and parent-child relationships and behaviors 15that isolate [adolescents and young adults] from their 16parents, families, non-transgender friends and mainstream 17sources of information are particularly concerning. More 18research is needed to better understand this phenomenon, its 19implications and scope." 20    (24) The number of children "being referred for 21transitioning treatment" in England has increased 4,400% for 22girls and 1,250% for boys, which has resulted in calls from 23members of Parliament for an investigation. 24    (25) Body Integrity Identity Disorder (BIID) shares in 25common several features with gender dysphoria. BIID is a 26condition in which "[s]ufferers from BIID experience a   SB2474- 11 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1mismatch between their physically healthy body and the body 2with which they identify. They identify as disabled. They 3often desire a specific amputation to achieve the disabled 4body they want." As with some cases of gender dysphoria, 5scientists say there is evidence for neurological involvement 6as a cause of the experience of BIID, and yet physicians 7largely oppose elective amputations of healthy anatomical 8parts: 9    According to the principle of nonmaleficence physicians 10must not perform amputations without a medical indication 11because amputations bear great risks and often have severe 12consequences besides the disability ... for example, 13infections [or] thromboses. Even though some physicians 14perform harmful surgeries as breast enlargement surgeries, 15this cannot justify surgeries that are even more harmful. Even 16if amputations would be a possible therapy for BIID, they 17would be risky experimental therapies that could be justified 18only if they promised lifesaving or the cure of severe 19diseases and if an alternative therapy would not be available. 20At least the first condition is not fulfilled in the case of 21BIID, and probably the second is not fulfilled either. Above 22all, an amputation causes an irreversible damage that could 23not be healed, even if the patient's body image would be 24restored spontaneously or through a new therapy. ... But since 25all psychiatrists who have investigated BIID patients found 26that the amputation desire is either obsessive or based on a   SB2474- 12 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1monothematic delusion, and since neurological studies support 2the hypothesis of a brain disorder (which is also supported by 3the most influential advocates of elective amputations), 4elective amputations have to be regarded as severe bodily 5injuries of patients. 6    (26) The American College of Pediatricians (ACPeds), "a 7national medical association of licensed physicians and 8healthcare professionals who specialize in the care of 9infants, children, and adolescents" that split from the 10American Academy of Pediatrics because of its politicization 11of the practice of medicine, describes puberty-suppression, 12cross-sex hormone, and surgeries variously referred to as 13sex-change, sex reassignment, gender reassignment and gender 14confirmation surgeries as child abuse."15    (27) Dr. Lisa Simons, pediatrician at Robert H. Lurie 16Children's Hospital of Chicago, stated in a PBS Frontline 17documentary that "'The bottom line is we don't really know how 18sex hormones impact any adolescent's brain development.' ... 19What's lacking, she said, are specific studies that look at 20the neurocognitive effects of puberty blockers." 21    (28) Dr. Kenneth Zucker, one of the world's leading 22authorities on gender dysphoria, states that:23    "Identity is a process. It is complicated. It takes a long 24period of time ... to know who a child really is. ... There are 25different pathways that can lead to gender dysphoria. ... It's 26an intellectual and clinical mistake to think that there's one   SB2474- 13 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1single cause that explains all gender dysphoria. ... Just 2because little kids say something doesn't necessarily mean 3that you accept it, or that it's true, or that it's in the best 4interest of the child. ... Little kids can present with 5extreme gender dysphoria, but that doesn't mean they're all 6going to grow up to continue to have gender dysphoria. 7    (29) Dr. Eric Vilain, a geneticist at UCLA who specializes 8in sexual development and sex differences in the brain, says 9the studies on twins are mixed and that, on the whole, "there 10is no evidence of a biological influence on transsexualism 11yet." 12    (30) Sheila Jeffreys, lesbian feminist scholar, warns 13against the "transgendering" of children: "Those who do not 14conform to correct gender stereotypes are being sterilized and 15they're being sterilized as children." 16    (31) Heather Brunskell-Evans Heather, social theorist, 17philosopher, and Senior Research Fellow at King's College, 18London, UK, and Michele Moore, Professor of Inclusive 19Education and Editor-in-Chief of the world-leading journal 20Disability & Society, critique the "transgender" ideology: 21    [O]ur central contention is that transgender children 22don't exist. Although we argue that 'the transgender child' is 23a fabrication, we do not disavow that some children and 24adolescents experience gender dysphoria and that concerned and 25loving parents will do anything to alleviate their children's 26distress. It is because of children's bodily discomfort that   SB2474- 14 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1we argue it is important families and support services are 2informed by appropriate models for understanding gender. Our 3analysis of transgenderism demonstrates it is a new 4phenomenon, since dissatisfaction with assigned gender takes 5different forms in different historical contexts. The 6'transgender child' is a relatively new historical figure, 7brought into being by a coalition of pressure groups, 8political activists and knowledge makers. ... Bizarrely, in 9transgender theory, biology is said to be a social construct 10but gender is regarded as an inherent property located 11'somewhere' in the brain or soul or other undefined area of the 12body. We reverse these propositions with the concept that it 13is gender, not biology, which is a social construct. From our 14theoretical perspective, the sexed body is material and 15biological, and gender is the externally imposed set of norms 16that prescribe and proscribe desirable [behaviors] for 17children. Our objection to transgenderism is that it confines 18children to traditional views about gender. 19    (32) Stephanie Davies-Arias, writer, communication skills 20expert, and pediatric transition critic, writes that "changing 21your sex to match your 'gender identity' reinforces the very 22stereotypes which [transgender organizations] claim to be 23challenging ... as, in increasing numbers, boys who love 24princess culture become 'girls' and short-haired 25football-loving girls become 'boys'. Promoted as a 26'progressive' social justice movement based on 'accepting   SB2474- 15 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1difference', transgender ideology in fact takes that 2difference and stamps it out. It says that the sexist 3stereotypes of 'gender' are the true distinction between boys 4and girls and biological sex is an illusion." 5    (33) Sex-change regret/De-transitioning: Increasing 6numbers of young men and women experience "sex-change regret" 7and are "detransitioning." Unfortunately, some effects of 8"medical transitions" are irreversible. A BBC documentary 9titled "Luke" includes a young biological woman who regrets 10taking cross-sex hormones and having a double mastectomy at 11age 20 and shares her experience. 12    Section 10. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to protect 13gender-dysphoric, gender-discordant, and 14gender-non-conforming minors or minors who experience rapid 15onset gender dysphoria from medical procedures or the 16off-label use of chemicals that have not been studied for 17these purposes and that permanently alter anatomy, 18biochemistry, or physiology. 19    The State has a moral duty and legal right to step in and 20regulate medical practices that are found in violation of the 21principles that inhere in the Nuremberg Code, including the 22principle that experiments should be based on previous 23knowledge (e.g., an expectation derived from animal 24experiments) that justifies the experiment.    SB2474- 16 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    Section 15. Definitions. As used in this Act:2    "Biological sex" means a person's objective, immutable 3biological sex, which may be understood according to the 4following: In biology, an organism is male or female if it is 5structured to perform one of the respective roles in 6reproduction. This definition does not require any arbitrary 7measurable or quantifiable physical characteristics or 8behaviors; it requires understanding the reproductive system 9and the reproduction process. Different animals have different 10reproductive systems, but sexual reproduction occurs when the 11sex cells from the male and female of the species come together 12to form newly fertilized embryos. It is these reproductive 13roles that provide the conceptual basis for the 14differentiation of animals into the biological categories of 15male and female. There is no other widely accepted biological 16classification for the sexes. 17    "Desistance" means the tendency for gender dysphoria to 18resolve itself as a child gets older and older.19    "Detransition" means the process by which someone who has 20been identifying as the opposite sex, presenting himself or 21herself as the opposite sex, taking cross-sex hormones, and 22may or may not have had surgery rejects his or her "trans" 23identity and accepts his or her objective, immutable 24biological sex.25    "Gender" means the psychological, behavioral, social, and 26cultural aspects of being male or female.   SB2474- 17 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    "Gender dysphoria" means one's persistent discomfort with 2his or her sex or sense of inappropriateness in the gender role 3of that sex. 4    "Gender identity" means one's sense of oneself as male, 5female, or transgender. "Gender identity" also means one's 6innermost concept of self as male, female, a blend of both male 7and female, or neither male nor female. 8    Section 20. Prohibition on treatment of persons under the 9age of 18 for gender dysphoria or gender discordance. 10    (a) A medical doctor shall not prescribe, provide, 11administer, or deliver puberty-suppressing drugs or cross-sex 12hormones and shall not perform surgical orchiectomy or 13castration, urethroplasty, vaginoplasty, mastectomy, 14phalloplasty, or metoidioplasty on biologically healthy and 15anatomically normal persons under the age of 18 for the 16purpose of treating the subjective, internal psychological 17condition of gender dysphoria or gender discordance. 18    (b) Any efforts to modify the anatomy, physiology, or 19biochemistry of a biologically healthy person under the age of 2018 who experiences gender dysphoria or gender discordance 21shall be considered unprofessional conduct and shall be 22subject to discipline by the licensing entity or disciplinary 23review board with competent jurisdiction.24    (c) No medical doctor or mental health provider shall 25refer any person under the age of 18 to any medical doctor for   SB2474- 18 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1chemical or surgical interventions to treat gender dysphoria 2or gender discordance. 3    Section 90. The Medical Practice Act of 1987 is amended by 4changing Section 22 as follows: 5    (225 ILCS 60/22)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4400-22)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)7    Sec. 22. Disciplinary action. 8    (A) The Department may revoke, suspend, place on 9probation, reprimand, refuse to issue or renew, or take any 10other disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the 11Department may deem proper with regard to the license or 12permit of any person issued under this Act, including imposing 13fines not to exceed $10,000 for each violation, upon any of the 14following grounds:15        (1) (Blank).16        (2) (Blank).17        (3) A plea of guilty or nolo contendere, finding of 18    guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or sentencing, 19    including, but not limited to, convictions, preceding 20    sentences of supervision, conditional discharge, or first 21    offender probation, under the laws of any jurisdiction of 22    the United States of any crime that is a felony.23        (4) Gross negligence in practice under this Act.24        (5) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or   SB2474- 19 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 2    defraud, or harm the public.3        (6) Obtaining any fee by fraud, deceit, or 4    misrepresentation.5        (7) Habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs 6    defined in law as controlled substances, of alcohol, or of 7    any other substances which results in the inability to 8    practice with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.9        (8) Practicing under a false or, except as provided by 10    law, an assumed name.11        (9) Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for, or 12    procuring, a license under this Act or in connection with 13    applying for renewal of a license under this Act.14        (10) Making a false or misleading statement regarding 15    their skill or the efficacy or value of the medicine, 16    treatment, or remedy prescribed by them at their direction 17    in the treatment of any disease or other condition of the 18    body or mind.19        (11) Allowing another person or organization to use 20    their license, procured under this Act, to practice.21        (12) Adverse action taken by another state or 22    jurisdiction against a license or other authorization to 23    practice as a medical doctor, doctor of osteopathy, doctor 24    of osteopathic medicine, or doctor of chiropractic, a 25    certified copy of the record of the action taken by the 26    other state or jurisdiction being prima facie evidence   SB2474- 20 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    thereof. This includes any adverse action taken by a State 2    or federal agency that prohibits a medical doctor, doctor 3    of osteopathy, doctor of osteopathic medicine, or doctor 4    of chiropractic from providing services to the agency's 5    participants. 6        (13) Violation of any provision of this Act or of the 7    Medical Practice Act prior to the repeal of that Act, or 8    violation of the rules, or a final administrative action 9    of the Secretary, after consideration of the 10    recommendation of the Medical Board.11        (14) Violation of the prohibition against fee 12    splitting in Section 22.2 of this Act.13        (15) A finding by the Medical Board that the 14    registrant after having his or her license placed on 15    probationary status or subjected to conditions or 16    restrictions violated the terms of the probation or failed 17    to comply with such terms or conditions.18        (16) Abandonment of a patient.19        (17) Prescribing, selling, administering, 20    distributing, giving, or self-administering any drug 21    classified as a controlled substance (designated product) 22    or narcotic for other than medically accepted therapeutic 23    purposes.24        (18) Promotion of the sale of drugs, devices, 25    appliances, or goods provided for a patient in such manner 26    as to exploit the patient for financial gain of the   SB2474- 21 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    physician.2        (19) Offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or 3    treat disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or 4    medicine, or the treating, operating, or prescribing for 5    any human condition by a method, means, or procedure which 6    the licensee refuses to divulge upon demand of the 7    Department.8        (20) Immoral conduct in the commission of any act, 9    including, but not limited to, commission of an act of 10    sexual misconduct related to the licensee's practice.11        (21) Willfully making or filing false records or 12    reports in his or her practice as a physician, including, 13    but not limited to, false records to support claims 14    against the medical assistance program of the Department 15    of Healthcare and Family Services (formerly Department of 16    Public Aid) under the Illinois Public Aid Code.17        (22) Willful omission to file or record, or willfully 18    impeding the filing or recording, or inducing another 19    person to omit to file or record, medical reports as 20    required by law, or willfully failing to report an 21    instance of suspected abuse or neglect as required by law.22        (23) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 23    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 24    under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, and 25    upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 26    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or   SB2474- 22 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 2    Child Reporting Act.3        (24) Solicitation of professional patronage by any 4    corporation, agents, or persons, or profiting from those 5    representing themselves to be agents of the licensee.6        (25) Gross and willful and continued overcharging for 7    professional services, including filing false statements 8    for collection of fees for which services are not 9    rendered, including, but not limited to, filing such false 10    statements for collection of monies for services not 11    rendered from the medical assistance program of the 12    Department of Healthcare and Family Services (formerly 13    Department of Public Aid) under the Illinois Public Aid 14    Code.15        (26) A pattern of practice or other behavior which 16    demonstrates incapacity or incompetence to practice under 17    this Act.18        (27) Mental illness or disability which results in the 19    inability to practice under this Act with reasonable 20    judgment, skill, or safety.21        (28) Physical illness, including, but not limited to, 22    deterioration through the aging process, or loss of motor 23    skill which results in a physician's inability to practice 24    under this Act with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.25        (29) Cheating on or attempting to subvert the 26    licensing examinations administered under this Act.  SB2474- 23 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1        (30) Willfully or negligently violating the 2    confidentiality between physician and patient except as 3    required by law.4        (31) The use of any false, fraudulent, or deceptive 5    statement in any document connected with practice under 6    this Act.7        (32) Aiding and abetting an individual not licensed 8    under this Act in the practice of a profession licensed 9    under this Act.10        (33) Violating State or federal laws or regulations 11    relating to controlled substances, legend drugs, or 12    ephedra as defined in the Ephedra Prohibition Act.13        (34) Failure to report to the Department any adverse 14    final action taken against them by another licensing 15    jurisdiction (any other state or any territory of the 16    United States or any foreign state or country), by any 17    peer review body, by any health care institution, by any 18    professional society or association related to practice 19    under this Act, by any governmental agency, by any law 20    enforcement agency, or by any court for acts or conduct 21    similar to acts or conduct which would constitute grounds 22    for action as defined in this Section.23        (35) Failure to report to the Department surrender of 24    a license or authorization to practice as a medical 25    doctor, a doctor of osteopathy, a doctor of osteopathic 26    medicine, or doctor of chiropractic in another state or   SB2474- 24 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    jurisdiction, or surrender of membership on any medical 2    staff or in any medical or professional association or 3    society, while under disciplinary investigation by any of 4    those authorities or bodies, for acts or conduct similar 5    to acts or conduct which would constitute grounds for 6    action as defined in this Section.7        (36) Failure to report to the Department any adverse 8    judgment, settlement, or award arising from a liability 9    claim related to acts or conduct similar to acts or 10    conduct which would constitute grounds for action as 11    defined in this Section.12        (37) Failure to provide copies of medical records as 13    required by law.14        (38) Failure to furnish the Department, its 15    investigators or representatives, relevant information, 16    legally requested by the Department after consultation 17    with the Chief Medical Coordinator or the Deputy Medical 18    Coordinator.19        (39) Violating the Health Care Worker Self-Referral 20    Act.21        (40) (Blank).22        (41) Failure to establish and maintain records of 23    patient care and treatment as required by this law.24        (42) Entering into an excessive number of written 25    collaborative agreements with licensed advanced practice 26    registered nurses resulting in an inability to adequately   SB2474- 25 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    collaborate.2        (43) Repeated failure to adequately collaborate with a 3    licensed advanced practice registered nurse.4        (44) Violating the Compassionate Use of Medical 5    Cannabis Program Act. 6        (45) Entering into an excessive number of written 7    collaborative agreements with licensed prescribing 8    psychologists resulting in an inability to adequately 9    collaborate.10        (46) Repeated failure to adequately collaborate with a 11    licensed prescribing psychologist. 12        (47) Willfully failing to report an instance of 13    suspected abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or 14    self-neglect of an eligible adult as defined in and 15    required by the Adult Protective Services Act.16        (48) Being named as an abuser in a verified report by 17    the Department on Aging under the Adult Protective 18    Services Act, and upon proof by clear and convincing 19    evidence that the licensee abused, neglected, or 20    financially exploited an eligible adult as defined in the 21    Adult Protective Services Act. 22        (49) Entering into an excessive number of written 23    collaborative agreements with licensed physician 24    assistants resulting in an inability to adequately 25    collaborate.26        (50) Repeated failure to adequately collaborate with a   SB2474- 26 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    physician assistant. 2        (51) Violating the Youth Health Protection Act. 3    Except for actions involving the ground numbered (26), all 4proceedings to suspend, revoke, place on probationary status, 5or take any other disciplinary action as the Department may 6deem proper, with regard to a license on any of the foregoing 7grounds, must be commenced within 5 years next after receipt 8by the Department of a complaint alleging the commission of or 9notice of the conviction order for any of the acts described 10herein. Except for the grounds numbered (8), (9), (26), and 11(29), no action shall be commenced more than 10 years after the 12date of the incident or act alleged to have violated this 13Section. For actions involving the ground numbered (26), a 14pattern of practice or other behavior includes all incidents 15alleged to be part of the pattern of practice or other behavior 16that occurred, or a report pursuant to Section 23 of this Act 17received, within the 10-year period preceding the filing of 18the complaint. In the event of the settlement of any claim or 19cause of action in favor of the claimant or the reduction to 20final judgment of any civil action in favor of the plaintiff, 21such claim, cause of action, or civil action being grounded on 22the allegation that a person licensed under this Act was 23negligent in providing care, the Department shall have an 24additional period of 2 years from the date of notification to 25the Department under Section 23 of this Act of such settlement 26or final judgment in which to investigate and commence formal   SB2474- 27 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1disciplinary proceedings under Section 36 of this Act, except 2as otherwise provided by law. The time during which the holder 3of the license was outside the State of Illinois shall not be 4included within any period of time limiting the commencement 5of disciplinary action by the Department.6    The entry of an order or judgment by any circuit court 7establishing that any person holding a license under this Act 8is a person in need of mental treatment operates as a 9suspension of that license. That person may resume his or her 10practice only upon the entry of a Departmental order based 11upon a finding by the Medical Board that the person has been 12determined to be recovered from mental illness by the court 13and upon the Medical Board's recommendation that the person be 14permitted to resume his or her practice.15    The Department may refuse to issue or take disciplinary 16action concerning the license of any person who fails to file a 17return, or to pay the tax, penalty, or interest shown in a 18filed return, or to pay any final assessment of tax, penalty, 19or interest, as required by any tax Act administered by the 20Illinois Department of Revenue, until such time as the 21requirements of any such tax Act are satisfied as determined 22by the Illinois Department of Revenue.23    The Department, upon the recommendation of the Medical 24Board, shall adopt rules which set forth standards to be used 25in determining:26        (a) when a person will be deemed sufficiently   SB2474- 28 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    rehabilitated to warrant the public trust;2        (b) what constitutes dishonorable, unethical, or 3    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 4    defraud, or harm the public;5        (c) what constitutes immoral conduct in the commission 6    of any act, including, but not limited to, commission of 7    an act of sexual misconduct related to the licensee's 8    practice; and9        (d) what constitutes gross negligence in the practice 10    of medicine.11    However, no such rule shall be admissible into evidence in 12any civil action except for review of a licensing or other 13disciplinary action under this Act.14    In enforcing this Section, the Medical Board, upon a 15showing of a possible violation, may compel any individual who 16is licensed to practice under this Act or holds a permit to 17practice under this Act, or any individual who has applied for 18licensure or a permit pursuant to this Act, to submit to a 19mental or physical examination and evaluation, or both, which 20may include a substance abuse or sexual offender evaluation, 21as required by the Medical Board and at the expense of the 22Department. The Medical Board shall specifically designate the 23examining physician licensed to practice medicine in all of 24its branches or, if applicable, the multidisciplinary team 25involved in providing the mental or physical examination and 26evaluation, or both. The multidisciplinary team shall be led   SB2474- 29 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1by a physician licensed to practice medicine in all of its 2branches and may consist of one or more or a combination of 3physicians licensed to practice medicine in all of its 4branches, licensed chiropractic physicians, licensed clinical 5psychologists, licensed clinical social workers, licensed 6clinical professional counselors, and other professional and 7administrative staff. Any examining physician or member of the 8multidisciplinary team may require any person ordered to 9submit to an examination and evaluation pursuant to this 10Section to submit to any additional supplemental testing 11deemed necessary to complete any examination or evaluation 12process, including, but not limited to, blood testing, 13urinalysis, psychological testing, or neuropsychological 14testing. The Medical Board or the Department may order the 15examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 16team to provide to the Department or the Medical Board any and 17all records, including business records, that relate to the 18examination and evaluation, including any supplemental testing 19performed. The Medical Board or the Department may order the 20examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 21team to present testimony concerning this examination and 22evaluation of the licensee, permit holder, or applicant, 23including testimony concerning any supplemental testing or 24documents relating to the examination and evaluation. No 25information, report, record, or other documents in any way 26related to the examination and evaluation shall be excluded by   SB2474- 30 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1reason of any common law or statutory privilege relating to 2communication between the licensee, permit holder, or 3applicant and the examining physician or any member of the 4multidisciplinary team. No authorization is necessary from the 5licensee, permit holder, or applicant ordered to undergo an 6evaluation and examination for the examining physician or any 7member of the multidisciplinary team to provide information, 8reports, records, or other documents or to provide any 9testimony regarding the examination and evaluation. The 10individual to be examined may have, at his or her own expense, 11another physician of his or her choice present during all 12aspects of the examination. Failure of any individual to 13submit to mental or physical examination and evaluation, or 14both, when directed, shall result in an automatic suspension, 15without hearing, until such time as the individual submits to 16the examination. If the Medical Board finds a physician unable 17to practice following an examination and evaluation because of 18the reasons set forth in this Section, the Medical Board shall 19require such physician to submit to care, counseling, or 20treatment by physicians, or other health care professionals, 21approved or designated by the Medical Board, as a condition 22for issued, continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure to 23practice. Any physician, whose license was granted pursuant to 24Section 9, 17, or 19 of this Act, or, continued, reinstated, 25renewed, disciplined, or supervised, subject to such terms, 26conditions, or restrictions who shall fail to comply with such   SB2474- 31 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1terms, conditions, or restrictions, or to complete a required 2program of care, counseling, or treatment, as determined by 3the Chief Medical Coordinator or Deputy Medical Coordinators, 4shall be referred to the Secretary for a determination as to 5whether the licensee shall have his or her license suspended 6immediately, pending a hearing by the Medical Board. In 7instances in which the Secretary immediately suspends a 8license under this Section, a hearing upon such person's 9license must be convened by the Medical Board within 15 days 10after such suspension and completed without appreciable delay. 11The Medical Board shall have the authority to review the 12subject physician's record of treatment and counseling 13regarding the impairment, to the extent permitted by 14applicable federal statutes and regulations safeguarding the 15confidentiality of medical records.16    An individual licensed under this Act, affected under this 17Section, shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to 18the Medical Board that he or she can resume practice in 19compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards under the 20provisions of his or her license.21    The Medical Board, in determining mental capacity of an 22individual licensed under this Act, shall consider the latest 23recommendations of the Federation of State Medical Boards. 24    The Department may promulgate rules for the imposition of 25fines in disciplinary cases, not to exceed $10,000 for each 26violation of this Act. Fines may be imposed in conjunction   SB2474- 32 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1with other forms of disciplinary action, but shall not be the 2exclusive disposition of any disciplinary action arising out 3of conduct resulting in death or injury to a patient. Any funds 4collected from such fines shall be deposited in the Illinois 5State Medical Disciplinary Fund.6    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 760 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 8or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 9the fine. 10    (B) The Department shall revoke the license or permit 11issued under this Act to practice medicine of or a 12chiropractic physician who has been convicted a second time of 13committing any felony under the Illinois Controlled Substances 14Act or the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection 15Act, or who has been convicted a second time of committing a 16Class 1 felony under Sections 8A-3 and 8A-6 of the Illinois 17Public Aid Code. A person whose license or permit is revoked 18under this subsection (B) B shall be prohibited from 19practicing medicine or treating human ailments without the use 20of drugs and without operative surgery.21    (C) The Department shall not revoke, suspend, place on 22probation, reprimand, refuse to issue or renew, or take any 23other disciplinary or non-disciplinary action against the 24license or permit issued under this Act to practice medicine 25to a physician: 26        (1) based solely upon the recommendation of the   SB2474- 33 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1    physician to an eligible patient regarding, or 2    prescription for, or treatment with, an investigational 3    drug, biological product, or device; 4        (2) for experimental treatment for Lyme disease or 5    other tick-borne diseases, including, but not limited to, 6    the prescription of or treatment with long-term 7    antibiotics;8        (3) based solely upon the physician providing, 9    authorizing, recommending, aiding, assisting, referring 10    for, or otherwise participating in any health care 11    service, so long as the care was not unlawful under the 12    laws of this State, regardless of whether the patient was 13    a resident of this State or another state; or 14        (4) based upon the physician's license being revoked 15    or suspended, or the physician being otherwise disciplined 16    by any other state, if that revocation, suspension, or 17    other form of discipline was based solely on the physician 18    violating another state's laws prohibiting the provision 19    of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding or 20    assisting in, referring for, or participation in any 21    health care service if that health care service as 22    provided would not have been unlawful under the laws of 23    this State and is consistent with the standards of conduct 24    for the physician if it occurred in Illinois. 25    (D) (Blank).26    (E) The conduct specified in subsection (C) shall not   SB2474- 34 -LRB104 12050 BDA 22145 b1trigger reporting requirements under Section 23, constitute 2grounds for suspension under Section 25, or be included on the 3physician's profile required under Section 10 of the Patients' 4Right to Know Act. 5    (F) An applicant seeking licensure, certification, or 6authorization pursuant to this Act and who has been subject to 7disciplinary action by a duly authorized professional 8disciplinary agency of another jurisdiction solely on the 9basis of having provided, authorized, recommended, aided, 10assisted, referred for, or otherwise participated in health 11care shall not be denied such licensure, certification, or 12authorization, unless the Department determines that the 13action would have constituted professional misconduct in this 14State; however, nothing in this Section shall be construed as 15prohibiting the Department from evaluating the conduct of the 16applicant and making a determination regarding the licensure, 17certification, or authorization to practice a profession under 18this Act.19    (G) The Department may adopt rules to implement the 20changes made by Public Act 102-1117 this amendatory Act of the 21102nd General Assembly. 22(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-442, eff. 241-1-24; revised 10-22-24.)